Illinois, session 104th, HB5371.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-185 and by adding Section 18-244 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)7    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 8may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 9used in this Division 5: 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 11All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 12States Department of Labor. 13    "Extension limitation" means (a) the lesser of 5% or the 14percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1512-month calendar year preceding the levy year or (b) the rate 16of increase approved by voters under Section 18-205. 17    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 19more inhabitants. 20    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 211-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 221991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 23only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of   HB5371- 2 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 2counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 4district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 5subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 6rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 7levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 8value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 9levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 10district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 11includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 12provided in Section 18-213. Beginning in taxable year 2027, 13"taxing district" also includes the City of Chicago. 14    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 15Law applied before the 1995 levy year and for the City of 16Chicago means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 17district and those special purpose extensions that are made 18annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 19extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 20or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 21referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 22or principal on general obligation bonds issued before October 231, 1991; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 24principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 25those bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any 26taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued   HB5371- 3 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1, 21991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 3district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 4before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 5or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 6pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 7principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 8governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 9other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 10payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 11lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 12issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 13building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 14contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 15payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 16Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 17construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 18made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 19as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 20Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 21less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 22definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 23initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 24of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 25the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 26district that participates in the Special Education District   HB5371- 4 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement 2under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 3school district's share of the amounts required to be 4contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 5to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 6the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 7this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 8county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 9recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 10Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 11the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 12loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1317-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 14and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 15Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 16to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 17Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 18under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 19(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 20assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 21liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 22district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 23the Illinois Highway Code; (q) made under Section 4 of the 24Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 25to supplement existing funds for community mental health 26facilities and services, including facilities and services for   HB5371- 5 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 2disorder; and (r) made for the payment of principal and 3interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 417-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 5those bonds. 6    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 7this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 8districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 918-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 10district and those special purpose extensions that are made 11annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 12extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 13or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 14referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 15or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 161, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 17principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 18those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 19taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 20to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 211995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 22district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 23before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 24or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 25pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 26principal on those bonds shall be made only after the   HB5371- 6 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 2other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 3payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 4lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 5issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 6building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 7contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 8payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 9Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 10construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 11made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 12Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 13of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 14for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 15Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 16Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 17under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 18payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 19defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 20in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 21the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 22non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 23issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 24subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 25payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 26Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made   HB5371- 7 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by 2Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 3Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 4issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 5the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 6established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 7made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 8authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 9pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 10District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 11Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 12(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 13Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 14pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 15annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 16recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 17Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 18the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 19District for recreational programs for persons with 20disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 21Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 22firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 23Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 24under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 25(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 2617-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making   HB5371- 8 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension 2and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 3School Code; (s) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental 4Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to supplement 5existing funds for community mental health facilities and 6services, including facilities and services for the person 7with a developmental disability or a substance use disorder; 8and (t) made for the payment of principal and interest on any 9bonds issued under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the 10School Code or to refund or continue to refund those bonds. 11    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 12this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 13those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 14(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 15for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 16that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 17special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 18to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 19were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 20to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 21issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 22applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 23taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 24to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 25date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 26taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to   HB5371- 9 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 2continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 3referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 4is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 5on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 6taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 7pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 8date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 9taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 10levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 11government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 12interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 13the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 14all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 15payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 16lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 17issued by the commission before the date on which the 18referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 19is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 20due under installment contracts entered into before the date 21on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 22taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 23and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 24Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 25the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 26(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum   HB5371- 10 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 2referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 3bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 4Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 5interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 6the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 7airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 8installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 9before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 10a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 11fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 12persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 13District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 14Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 15fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 16the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 174-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 18district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 19bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 20(n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act to 21provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 22for community mental health facilities and services, including 23facilities and services for the person with a developmental 24disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) made for the 25payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued under 26the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to   HB5371- 11 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1refund or continue to refund those bonds. 2    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 3this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 4subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 5extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 6extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 7excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 8district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 9bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 10taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 11obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 12date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 13pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 14continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 15(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 16taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 17to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 181997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 19were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 20date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 21pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 227, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 23of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 24the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 25payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 26only after the governing body of the unit of local government   HB5371- 12 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 2make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 3commission lease when the lease payments are for the 4retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 51997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 6building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 7contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 8date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 9and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 10Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 11the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 12(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 13obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 14referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 15bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 16Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 17interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 18the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 19airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 20installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 21before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 22a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 23fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 24persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 25District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 26Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension   HB5371- 13 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 2the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 34-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made under Section 4 of 4the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds 5or to supplement existing funds for community mental health 6facilities and services, including facilities and services for 7the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 8disorder; and (n) made for the payment of principal and 9interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1017-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 11those bonds. 12    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 13that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 141994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 15Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 16subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 17for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 18applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 19districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 20of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 21constituting an extension for payment of principal and 22interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 23referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 24For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 251991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 26for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by   HB5371- 14 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1the park district without referendum (but not including 2excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 3for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 4of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 5without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 6bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 7that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 8constituting an extension for payment of principal and 9interest on bonds issued by the park district without 10referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 11A debt service extension base established or increased at any 12time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 1318-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 14of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 15this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 16lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 17Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the levy 18year. The debt service extension base may be established or 19increased as provided under Section 18-212. "Excluded 20non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by Public Act 2188-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park 22District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 23issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 24Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 25continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 26referendum.   HB5371- 15 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 2to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 3unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 4contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 5to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 6district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 7The extension for a special service area is not included in the 8aggregate extension. 9    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 10last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1118-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 12levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 13Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 14base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 15adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 16levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 17counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 18estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 19taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 20in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 21decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 22as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 23required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 24the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 25aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 26the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual,   HB5371- 16 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 2calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 3(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 4been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 62012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 7District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 9purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 10the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 11School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 132022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 14program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 15levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 16shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 17base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 18levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 19    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 201-155. 21    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 22board of review or board of appeals action, of new 23improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 24parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 25that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 26equalization factor issued by the Department under Section   HB5371- 17 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b117-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 2board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 3estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 4estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 5levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 6Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 7upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 8is complete, of any real property located within the 9boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 10reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 11or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 12counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 13IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 14additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 15in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 16board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 17assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 18well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 19Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 20during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 21in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 22include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 23school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 24applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 25    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 26organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a   HB5371- 18 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 2population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 3    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 4provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 5equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 6municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 7redevelopment project area previously established under the 8Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 9Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 10Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 11established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 12Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 13Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 14each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 15the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 16equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 17project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 18levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 19rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 20the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 21assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 22increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 23area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 24established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 25Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 26under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois   HB5371- 19 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 2Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 3equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 4lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 5redevelopment project area over and above the initial 6equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 7project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 8taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 9redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 10Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 11the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 12Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 13Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 14amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 15taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 16from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 17equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 18from the redevelopment project area. 19    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 20rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 21preceding aggregate extension base times an amount equal to 22one plus the extension limitation defined in this Section and 23the denominator of which is the current year's equalized 24assessed value of all real property in the territory under the 25jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 26year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate   HB5371- 20 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b1extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 2districts that reduced their extension for educational 3purposes pursuant to Section 18-206, the highest aggregate 4extension in any of the last 3 preceding levy years shall be 5used for the purpose of computing the limiting rate. The 6denominator shall not include new property or the recovered 7tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate decrease, or a 8limiting rate increase has been approved at an election held 9after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise applicable 10limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of the new rate 11or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate decrease, as the 12case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting rate increase, 13the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set forth in the 14proposition approved by the voters for each of the years 15specified in the proposition, after which the limiting rate of 16the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise provided. 17In the case of a taxing district that obtained referendum 18approval for an increased limiting rate on March 20, 2012, the 19limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate that 20generates the approximate total amount of taxes extendable for 21that tax year, as set forth in the proposition approved by the 22voters; this rate shall be the final rate applied by the county 23clerk for the aggregate of all capped funds of the district for 24tax year 2012.25(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 26103-591, eff. 7-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-417, eff.   HB5371- 21 -LRB104 19200 HLH 32645 b18-15-25.) 2    (35 ILCS 200/18-244 new)3    Sec. 18-244. Home rule. This is a denial and limitation of 4home rule powers and functions in accordance with subsection 5(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.